Vermont, session 2025-2026, S16.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 1791 is amended to read:
§ 1791. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(4) “Infant changing station” means a space within a restroom where an
infant’s diaper can be changed.
(5) “Available” means that any individual, regardless of gender, can
enter the restroom where the infant changing station is located to change an
infant’s diaper.
VT LEG #379233 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.16
2025 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 1794 is added to read:
§ 1794. INFANT CHANGING STATIONS
(a) At least one restroom in any public building or place of public
accommodation shall contain an infant changing station and the restroom shall
be available for use by any individual, regardless of gender.
(b) The Commissioner of Public Safety may inspect for compliance under
subsection (a) of this section during any inspection conducted pursuant to
20 V.S.A. § 2731(b).
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379233 v.1